Utah statutes.
78B-18-104.   Validity of unsworn declaration.
(1)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsection (2), if a law of this state
requires or permits use of a sworn declaration, an unsworn declaration meeting
the requirements of this chapter has the same effect as a sworn declaration.
(2)  This chapter does not apply to:
(a)  depositions;
(b)  oaths of office;
(c)  oaths required to be given before a specified official other than a
notary public;
(d)  declarations to be recorded pursuant to Title 57, Real Estate; or
(e)  oaths required by Section 75-2-504.
